North Carolina statutes. Chapter 153B. Mountain Resources Planning Act.
§§ 153B-1 through 153B-4.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-413, s. 43. For effective date, see editor’s note.

History.

S. 153B-1; 2009-485, s. 1; repealed by 2013-413, s. 43. s. 153B-2; 2009-485, s. 1; 2010-142, s. 14; repealed by 2013-413, s. 43. s. 153B-3; 2009-485, s. 1; 2010-142, s. 15; 2010-180, s. 7(g); 2011-372, s. 1; repealed by 2013-413, s. 43. s. 153B-4; 2009-485, s. 1; 2010-142, s. 16; repealed by 2013-413, s. 43. For effective date of these repeals, see editor’s note.

Editor’s Note.

Former

G.S. 153B-1

pertained to title, legislative findings and purpose. Former G.S. 153B-2 pertained to definitions. Former G.S. 153B-3 pertained to the Mountain Resources Commission. Former G.S. 153B-4 pertained to the Mountain Area Resources Technical Advisory Council.

Session Laws 2013-413, s. 61(b), provides: “Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes law [August 23, 2013].”
Session Laws 2013-413, s. 60(c), had provided that: “This act becomes effective July 1, 2015.” Session Laws 2014-115, s. 17, amended Session Laws 2013-413, s. 60(c), to replace the reference to “This act” with the words “This Part.”

Session Laws 2013-413, s. 61(a), is a severability clause.